Hawaii statutes.
PART III.
PRIVATE WAYS AND WATER RIGHTS

Cross References

State water code, see chapter 174C.

Rules of Court

Applicability of Hawaii Rules of Civil Procedure, see HRCP
rule 81(b)(12).

§664-31 Definitions. Wherever used in
this part:

"Controversy" means the matter or
question at issue before the court.

"Private individuals or persons"
means either individuals, companies, or corporations, or any others except the
State. [L 1886, c 69, §1; am L 1888, c 26, §1; am L 1907, c 56, §1; RL 1925,
§2936; RL 1935, §3677; RL 1945, §10218; RL 1955, §234-30; HRS §664-31; am L
1972, c 90, §6(1)]

Case Notes

Cited: 9 H. 651, 652 (1895); 20 H. 658, 660 (1911); 21 H.
280, 282 (1912).

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next